Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-503
Program;
participation; incentives.

Each year the department shall
select from a pool of applicants up to four veterinarians to participate in
the program. The selected veterinarians are eligible to receive up to eighty
thousand dollars under the program as an incentive to locate in rural Nebraska
and practice food supply animal veterinary medicine.

Laws
2008, LB1172, § 3.